src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON BERN-surmal !!= @CODE@  name that are both sur- and male names
! Different lexicon for male persons & personal surnames.
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>                BERNDECL ;
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>                BERNDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #        ;

!!€gt-norm: Pipin # Even-syllable test
!!€ Pipin:               Pipin+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom
!!€ Pipinaj:              Pipin+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill
!!€ Pipinas:              Pipin+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela


LEXICON BERN-fem !!= @CODE@  Female name
! Different lexicon for female persons. Audhild.
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>                BERNDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #        ;

!!€gt-norm: Ragnfrid # Even-syllable test
!!€ Ragnfrid:               Ragnfrid+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom
!!€ Ragnfridaj:              Ragnfrid+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill
!!€ Ragnfridas:              Ragnfrid+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela

LEXICON BERN-femplc !!= @CODE@ Both female and placenames. Not used in smj-propernouns
! Different lexicon for female persons. Audhild.
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>                BERNDECL     ;
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>                BERNDECL-PLC ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #            ;
          +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen@U.Cap.Opt@:%>a000@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK       ;


LEXICON BERN-sur !!= @CODE@ Surnames
! Different lexicon for personal surnames. Blind
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>                BERNDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #        ;

!!€gt-norm: Lind # Even-syllable test
!!€ Lind:               Lind+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom
!!€ Lindaj:              Lind+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill
!!€ Lindas:              Lind+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela



LEXICON BERN-plc !!= @CODE@ Placenames
! Different lexicon for place names. Bern.
                   +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>                BERNDECL-PLC ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen@U.Cap.Opt@:%>a000@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK       ;

!!€gt-norm: Beijing # Even-syllable test
!!€ Beijing:               Beijing+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom
!!€ Beijingaj:              Beijing+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill
!!€ Beijingas:              Beijing+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela


LEXICON BERN-objsur !!= @CODE@  Names used as both objects and surnames. 
! Different lexicon for names that are both surnames and places.
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> BERNDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> BERNDECL ;

!!€gt-norm: Stenbukk # Even-syllable test
!!€ Stenbukk:                Stenbukk+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom
!!€ Stenbukkaj:              Stenbukk+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill
!!€ Stenbukkas:              Stenbukk+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela

LEXICON BERN-orgsur !!= @CODE@ Names used for both organizations and surnames. 
! Different lexicon for names that are both surnames and places.
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> BERNDECL     ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> BERNDECL-ORG ;

!!€gt-norm: Nord # Even-syllable test
!!€ Nord:               Nord+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom
!!€ Nordaj:              Nord+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill
!!€ Nordas:              Nord+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela

LEXICON BERN-obj !!= @CODE@ Objects. Obs: Different lexicon for organisations. Microsoft.
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> BERNDECL ;

!!€gt-norm: Sult # Even-syllable test
!!€ Sult:                Sult+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom
!!€ Sultaj:              Sult+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill
!!€ Sultas:              Sult+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela

LEXICON BERN-org !!= @CODE@ Organizations
! Different lexicon for organisations. Microsoft.
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> BERNDECL-ORG ;

!!€gt-norm: Laks # Even-syllable test
!!€ Laks:              Laks+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom
!!€ Laksaj:              Laks+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill
!!€ Laksas:              Laks+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela

LEXICON BERN-LOAN-org !!= @CODE@ Organizations loan.  
! Different lexicon for organisations. Microsoft.
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> BERNDECL-LOAN ;

!!€gt-norm: Reinsamelag # Even-syllable test
!!€ Reinsamelag:               Reinsamelag+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom
!!$ Reinsamelagaj:              Reinsamelag+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill
!!$ Reinsamelagas:              Reinsamelag+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela

LEXICON BERN-LOAN-plc !!= @CODE@ Placenames loan. 
! Different lexicon for place names. Bern.
                           +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>                BERNDECL-LOAN ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen@U.Cap.Opt@+Err/Orth:%>a000@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK        ;

!!€gt-norm: Mehamn # Even-syllable test
!!€ Mehamn:               Mehamn+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom
!!$ Mehamnaj:              Mehamn+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill
!!$ Mehamnas:              Mehamn+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela

LEXICON BERN-LOAN-obj !!= @CODE@ Objects loan. 
! Different lexicon for objects, concrete and abstract. Word.
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> BERNDECL-LOAN ;

!!€gt-norm: Verneplan # Even-syllable test
!!€ Verneplan:                Verneplan+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom
!!$ Verneplanaj:              Verneplan+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill
!!$ Verneplanas:              Verneplan+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela

!LEXICON BERN-femsur ! Not in use.
! Different lexicon for female persons & personal surnames.
! +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%> BERNDECL ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> BERNDECL ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !SUB

!LEXICON BERN-surplc
!! Different lexicon for names that are both surnames and places.
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> BERNDECL ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> BERNDECL_PLC-ORG ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen@U.Cap.Opt@:%>a@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK ;

LEXICON BERN
 +N+Prop:%> BERNDECL ;

LEXICON BERNDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ BERNUCASE ;

LEXICON BERNDECL-ORG
 @U.Cap.Obl@ BERNUCASE-ORG ;

LEXICON BERNDECL-PLC
 @U.Cap.Obl@ BERNUCASE ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ      ; ! XXX Sub?

LEXICON BERNDECL-LOAN
 @U.Cap.Obl@ BERNUCASE-LOAN ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ           ; ! XXX Sub?

LEXICON BERNUCASE ! Final foot structure (X) => Loc:as
 +Sg+Nom:     K     ;
 +Sg+Nom:     RHyph ;
 +Sg+Ill:aj   K     ;
    +Ess:an   K     ;
 +Sg+Gen:a    K     ;
 +Sg+Gen:a    RHyph ;
 +Sg+Acc:av   K     ;
 +Sg+Ine:an   K     ;
 +Sg+Ela:as   K     ;
 +Pl+Nom:a    K     ;
 +Pl+Gen:aj   K     ;
 +Pl+Gen:aj   RHyph ;
 +Pl+Acc:ajt  K     ;
 +Pl+Ill:ajda K     ;
 +Pl+Ine:ajn  K     ;
 +Pl+Ela:ajs  K     ;
 +Pl+Com:aj   K     ;
 +Sg+Com:ajn  K     ;

LEXICON BERNUCASE-ORG ! Final foot structure (X) => Loc:as
 +Sg+Nom:    K     ;
 +Sg+Nom:    RHyph ;
 +Sg+Ill:aj  K     ;
    +Ess:an  K     ;
 +Sg+Gen:a   K     ;
 +Sg+Gen:a   RHyph ;
 +Sg+Acc:av  K     ;
 +Sg+Ine:an  K     ;
 +Sg+Ela:as  K     ;
! +Pl+Nom:a K ;
! +Pl+Gen:aj K ;
! +Pl+Gen:aj RHyph ;
! +Pl+Acc:ajt K ;
! +Pl+Ill:ajda K ;
! +Pl+Ine:ajn K ;
! +Pl+Ela:ajs K ;
! +Pl+Com:aj K ;
 +Sg+Com:ajn K     ;

LEXICON BERNUCASE-LOAN ! Final foot structure (X) => Loc:as
         +Sg+Nom:    K     ;
         +Sg+Nom:    RHyph ;
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:aj  K     ;
    +Ess+Err/Orth:an  K     ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:a   K     ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:a   RHyph ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:av  K     ;
 +Sg+Ine+Err/Orth:an  K     ;
 +Sg+Ela+Err/Orth:as  K     ;
! +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:a K ;
! +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:aj K ;
! +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:aj RHyph ;
! +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:ajt K ;
! +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:ajda K ;
! +Pl+Ine+Err/Orth:ajn K ;
! +Pl+Ela+Err/Orth:ajs K ;
! +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:aj K ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:ajn K     ;

!! Lexicons OY work as BERN lexicons

LEXICON OY-plc
BERN-plc ;

LEXICON OY-sur
BERN-sur ;

LEXICON OY-fem
BERN-fem ;

!! Words in LONDONBERN are sent to both LONDON and BERN lexicons. Non-assmilated stems.

LEXICON LONDONBERN-plc
	 LONDON-plc ;
	 BERN-plc ;

!! !!Plurals
! =============

!! Words in lexicon VARGGAT even-syllable sámi plurals .
