src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ProperNoun
Aahlin BERN-sur ;
Avias:Avi^as BERN-plc ;
Aškenas BERN-org ;
DumDum% Boys:Dum^Dum% Boys BERN-org ;
Kjårdavatn BERN-plc ;
Kwajalein BERN-plc ;
Laks BERN-org ;
Laks BERN-org ;
Lind BERN-sur ;
Lind BERN-sur ;
Ofelaš BERN-obj ;
Press:Press9 BERN-sur ;
Seidajok:Seidajok9 BERN-plc ;
Snev BERN-sur ;
Snev BERN-sur ;
Suðuroy:Suður^oy BERN-plc ;
Sáme% Grand% Prix BERN-obj ;
Sápmelaš BERN-obj ;
Vuolát:Vuolád9 BERN-sur ;
Westgård BERN-sur ;
Beijin:Beijin9 BERN-plc ;
Beijing:Beijing BERN-plc ;
